trunk/incubator/apertium-he-ar.he.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- אורח; אורח -->
    <pardef n="אורח__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ים</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ת</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ות</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="אורח"><i>אורח</i><par n="אורח__n"/></e> <!-- guest -->
  </section>
</dictionary>
